Hawaii statutes.
§467-25 Disciplinary action against
licensee. Nothing contained herein shall limit the authority of the real
estate commission to take disciplinary action against any licensee for a
violation of this chapter, or the rules and regulations of the commission; nor
shall the repayment in full of all obligations to the real estate recovery fund
by any licensee nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary
proceeding brought pursuant to this chapter. [L 1967, c 187, pt of §1; HRS
§467-25]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next